Maine, session 132, LD265.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §191 is enacted to read:
§191. Deployment to active duty combat
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Active duty combat" means performing the following services in the active United
States Armed Forces:
(1) Participation in armed combat in a foreign nation;
(2) Performance of a hazardous service relating to an armed conflict in a
jurisdiction outside of the United States or the territories of the United States; or
(3) Performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war.
B. "Official declaration of war" means a declaration of war made by the United States
Congress pursuant to the United States Constitution, Article I, Section 8, Clause 11.
2. Release into active duty combat. The military forces or a member of the military
forces may not be released from the State into active duty combat unless the United States
Congress has passed an official declaration of war or has taken an official action for an
enumerated purpose under the United States Constitution, Article I, Section 8, Clause 15.
3. Governor actions. The Governor shall take all actions necessary to comply with
subsection 2 and may deploy the military forces for a civil mission within the United States
and the territories of the United States pursuant to section 103. This section does not
prohibit the Governor from deploying the military forces under 32 United States Code.